Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 1. Agricultural Practices and Production

§ 4601.
Repealed. 2011, No. 52, § 73, eff. May 27, 2011.

§ 4602.
Good Agricultural Practices Grant Program.

A Good Agricultural Practices Grant Program (GAP) is established in the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets for the purpose of providing matching grant funds to agricultural producers whose markets require them to obtain or maintain GAP certification.

The Secretary may award matching grants for capital upgrades that will support Vermont agricultural producers in obtaining GAP certification. The amount of matching funds required by an applicant for a GAP certification grant shall be determined by the Secretary.

An applicant may receive no more than 10 percent of the total funds appropriated for the Program in a fiscal year.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 52

, § 40, eff. May 27, 2011.